Wyoming statutes. Title 20 Domestic Relations
Article 1. [Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction Act]

§§ 20-5-101 through 20-5-125.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 11, § 3.

Cross references. —

For present similar provisions, see §

20-5-201

et seq., the Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1973, ch. 240, § 1, compiled the Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction Act.